Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,103.06
Governing body; exempt certain contracts.

Any governing body may exempt from sections 49-14,103.01 to 49-14,103.03 contracts involving one hundred dollars or less in which an officer of such body may have an interest.

Laws 1986, LB 548, § 7.